Utah statutes.
53C-1-304.   Rules to ensure procedural due process -- Board review of
director action -- Judicial review.
(1)  The board shall make rules to ensure procedural due process in the
resolution of complaints concerning actions by the board, director, and the
administration.
(2)  An aggrieved party to a final action by the director or the
administration may petition the board for administrative review of the
decision.
(3) (a)  The board may appoint a qualified hearing examiner for purposes of
taking evidence and making recommendations for board action.
(b)  The board shall consider the recommendations of the examiner in making
decisions.
(4) (a)  The board shall uphold the decision of the director or the
administration unless it finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
decision violated applicable law, policy, or rules.
(b)  The board shall base its final actions on findings and conclusions and
shall inform the aggrieved party of its right to judicial review.
(5)  An aggrieved party to a final action by the board may obtain judicial
review of that action under Sections 63G-4-402 and 63G-4-403.
